Utah statutes.
35A-8-1008.   Recognition of community action agencies.

The office may:

(1)  recognize eligible organizations as community action agencies;

(2)  withdraw the recognition or terminate funding of a designated community action agency for cause, as established by rule made by the division in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(3)  change the boundaries and the number of recognized community action agencies, provided that the governing board of each affected community action agency concurs in the action.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

